Utah statutes.
38-2-2.   Liens of hotels and boardinghouse keepers.

Every innkeeper, hotel keeper, boardinghouse or lodginghouse keeper shall have a lien on the baggage and other property in and about such inn belonging to or under control of his guests or boarders for the proper charges due him for their accommodation, board and lodging, for money paid for or advanced to them, and for such other extras as are furnished at their request. The innkeeper, hotel keeper, boardinghouse or lodginghouse keeper may detain such baggage and other property until the amount of such charge is paid, and the baggage and other property shall not be exempt from attachment or execution until the hotel or boardinghouse keeper's lien and the costs of enforcing it are satisfied.

